Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.710.230

Facilities—State funding for common school construction.

(1) Charter schools are eligible for state funding for school construction. However, such appropriations may not be made from the common school construction fund.

(2) If a school district decides to sell or lease the public school facility or property pursuant to RCW 28A.335.040 or 28A.335.120, a charter school located within the boundaries of the district has a right of first refusal to purchase or lease at fair market value a closed public school facility or property or unused portions of a public school facility or property by negotiated agreement with mutual consideration. The consideration may include the provision of educational services by the charter school.

(3) A charter school may negotiate and contract with a school district, the governing body of a public college or university, or any other public or private entity for the use of a facility for a school building at fair market rent.

(4) Public libraries, community service organizations, museums, performing arts venues, theaters, and public or private colleges and universities may provide space to charter schools within their facilities under their preexisting zoning and land use designations.

[ 2016 c 241 s 123. Prior: 2013 c 2 s 223 (Initiative Measure No. 1240, approved November 6, 2012).]